Illinois, session 104th, HB5512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 6205-455 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 205/205-455 new)8    Sec. 205-455. Fall covers for spring savings.9    (a) The General Assembly finds that:10        (1) Soil is an essential natural resource and Illinois 11    farmers and professionals play a critical role in managing 12    Illinois soil and water resources.13        (2) The Natural Resources Conservation Service of the 14    United States Department of Agriculture defines soil 15    health as the continued capacity of soil to function as a 16    vital living ecosystem that sustains plants, animals, and 17    humans.18        (3) The protection of Illinois soils is essential to 19    long-term prosperity and sustainability of the soil and 20    water resources of our State.21        (4) Soil health principles of cover crop coverage 22    enhance the ability of farmers to meet the non-point 23    source pollution goals for nitrate-nitrogen and phosphorus   HB5512- 2 -LRB104 20018 BDA 33469 b1    reduction.2        (5) Soil health principles reduce carbon dioxide in 3    the atmosphere through sequestration of carbon within the 4    upper soil profile. This process improves organic matter 5    content, provides a stable biome for soil organisms, 6    improves nutrient transfer from soil to root, and 7    increases water infiltration and water-holding capacity.8        (6) It is imperative that the State of Illinois 9    actively raise awareness of the importance of soil health 10    and promote its stewardship to safeguard this resource for 11    future generations of Illinois citizens.12    (b) There is created the Fall Covers for Spring Savings 13Program within the Department of Agriculture. This program 14shall be the successor program of any program currently in 15place that offers crop insurance discounts for cover crop 16incorporation. The program shall offer a crop insurance policy 17premium discount of up to $5 per acre for every acre planted in 18cover crop in a calendar year that is insured in the following 19calendar year for crop production. For every $5 expenditure 20that is made under this Program, the Department shall grant $1 21to Soil and Water Conservation Districts in the State.22    (c) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 23to be known as the Cover Crop Insurance Premium Discount Fund 24for the purpose of receiving and distributing money in 25accordance with this Section. Disbursements from the Fund 26shall be made in accordance with this Section, including for   HB5512- 3 -LRB104 20018 BDA 33469 b1the Fall Covers for Spring Savings Program and the grants to 2Soil and Water Conservation Districts under subsection (b), 3for any other expenditure or distribution under this Section, 4and for no other purpose. In addition to any other amounts 5deposited into the Fund through action by the General 6Assembly, there shall be deposited into the Fund any residual 7federal funds that can be used for the purpose of the Program 8and all moneys donated to the State by private individuals or 9entities for the purposes for which the moneys in the Fund may 10be used.11    (d) The number of acres receiving the discount under the 12Program under this Section shall be limited only by available 13funding from State, federal, and private sources contained in 14the Cover Crop Insurance Premium Discount Fund.15    (e) The Department may use a portion of funding allocated 16to the Cover Crop Insurance Premium Discount Fund for the 17purpose of administering the provisions of this Section.18    (f) The application period for receiving the crop 19insurance premium discount shall commence the first week of 20December and continue through the end of January of the 21following calendar year or until available funds are depleted, 22whichever comes first. The Department may change the 23application period by rule.24    (g) Premium discounts shall be awarded from available 25funds on a first-come, first-served basis.26    (h) Applicants to the program shall submit Farm Service   HB5512- 4 -LRB104 20018 BDA 33469 b1Agency Form 578, Report on Acreage, or its successor document, 2the crop insurance policy number, the field, farm, tract, 3common land unit numbers, and field acres seeded in cover 4crops the previous year. The Department may change applicant 5submission requirements by rule.6    (i) Applicants shall maintain documentation of cover crop 7utilization, including, but not limited to, seeding dates, 8appropriate seeding rates, and seed mix. The Department may 9contact applicants to clarify information contained in any 10application. The Department may change applicant documentation 11requirements by rule.12    (j) The Department may not consider the participation of 13the applicant in any federal or private program concerning 14conservation, nutrient loss, or carbon sequestration when 15considering applicants and their applications for 16participation in the program.17    (k) The Department shall adopt rules implementing and 18administering this Section. 19    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 20Section 5.1038 as follows: 21    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)22    Sec. 5.1038. The Cover Crop Insurance Premium Discount 23Fund.